Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 2
BONDS - FUNDING AND REFUNDING BY NEW COUNTY

Cross references:

For the "Public Securities Refunding Act", see article 56 of title 11.

30-26-201. Fund or refund liabilities.

Any county in this state, formed and established from the territory of another county, or other counties, may fund, or refund, any of the liabilities imposed on such new county by section 4 of article XIV of the state constitution and the law forming and establishing such county, in the same manner, and with the like force and effect, as if such liabilities were originally contracted, in the form in which they may exist, by such new county.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 148, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1384.

C.L.

§ 8862.

CSA:

C. 45, § 214.

CRS 53:

§ 36-5-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-5-1.

30-26-202. County shall assume payment of bonds.

To render the amount, kind, and character of such liabilities definite and certain and fix their status under the funding and refunding laws of this state, the county imposed with the payment thereof, by the proper action of its board of county commissioners entered of record in the proceedings of the board, shall undertake and assume the payment thereof, designate and describe the same, and state their character and amount and the form in which they exist.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 149, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1385.

C.L.

§ 8863.

CSA:

C. 45, § 215.

CRS 53:

§ 36-5-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-5-2.